hr-HR: Značajke daske za surfanje: Podesivi remen; Protuklizna; Čvrsta; Na napuhavanje; Meka; Ostalo
lt-LT: Banglentės ypatybės: Reguliuojamas dirželis; Apsauga nuo slydimo; Kietas viršus; Pripučiamas; Minkštas viršus; Kita
cs: Vlastnosti surfového prkna: Nastavitelný popruh; Protiskluzové; Pevná střecha; Nafukovací; Měkká střecha; Jiné
bg-BG: Характеристики на дъската за сърф: Регулируема каишка; Противоплъзгащ се; Твърд; Надуваем; Мек; Други
en: Surfboard features: Adjustable strap; Anti-slip; Hard top; Inflatable; Soft top; Other
nl: Kenmerken surfplank: Verstelbare band; Antislip; Hardtop; Opblaasbaar; Softtop; Andere
nb: Surfebrettfunksjoner: Regulerbar stropp; Antiskli; Hard topp; Oppblåsbar; Myk topp; Annet
it: Funzionalità della tavola da surf: Cinghia regolabile; Antiscivolo; Copertura rigida; Gonfiabile; Copertura soffice; Altro
da: Surfboardfunktioner: Justerbar rem; Skridsikker; Hård top; Oppustelig; Blød top; Andet
pl: Charakterystyka deski surfingowej: Regulowany pasek; Antypoślizgowa; Twarda górna powierzchnia; Nadmuchiwana; Miękka górna powierzchnia; Inne
zh-CN: 冲浪板特点: 可调扣带; 防滑; 硬板; 膨胀; 软板; 其他
ja: サーフボードの機能: 調節可能なストラップ; 滑り止め; ハードトップ; インフレータブル; ソフトトップ; その他
ko: 서핑보드 기능: 조절식 스트랩; 미끄럼 방지; 하드톱; 공기주입식; 소프트톱; 기타
pt-PT: Características da prancha de surf: Alça ajustável; Antideslizante; Parte superior rígida; Insuflável; Parte superior suave; Outro
ru: Характеристики доски для серфинга: Регулируемый ремешок; Противоскользящий; Жесткий верх; Надувной; Мягкий верх; Другое
th: คุณลักษณะของกระดานโต้คลื่น: สายรัดที่ปรับได้; กันลื่น; พื้นแข็ง; เติมลม; พื้นนิ่ม; อื่นๆ
hu: Szörfdeszka jellemzői: Állítható pánt; Csúszásgátló; Kemény felső; Felfújható; Puha felső; Egyéb
vi: Tính năng ván lướt sóng: Điều chỉnh được dây; Chống trơn trượt; Mui cứng; Lốp bơm hơi; Mui mềm; Khác
zh-TW: 衝浪板特點: 帶子可調; 防滑; 硬頂; 充氣式; 軟頂; 其他
el: Χαρακτηριστικά σανίδας του σερφ: Ρυθμιζόμενος ιμάντας; Αντιολισθητική; Σκληρή κορυφή; Φουσκωτή; Μαλακό τοπ; Άλλο
fr: Caractéristiques de la planche de surf: Sangle réglable; Antidérapant; Rigide; Gonflable; Souple; Autre
tr: Sörf tahtası özellikleri: Ayarlanabilir kayış; Kaydırmaz; Sert yüzey; Şişirilebilir; Yumuşak yüzey; Diğer
sv: Detaljer för surfbräda: Justerbar rem; Halkskydd; Hård topp; Uppblåsbar; Mjuk topp; Övrigt
es: Características de la tabla de surf: Correa regulable; Antideslizante; Superficie dura; Inflable; Superficie blanda; Otros
pt-BR: Recursos da prancha de surfe: Alça ajustável; Antiderrapante; Parte superior rígida; Inflável; Parte superior macia; Outro
sl-SI: Lastnosti deske za surfanje: Nastavljiv trak; Proti zdrsu; Trda površina; Napihljiva; Mehka površina; Drugo
ro-RO: Caracteristici placă de surf: Curea reglabilă; Antiderapant; Suprafață dură; Gonflabil; Suprafață moale; Altele
fi: Surffilaudan ominaisuudet: Säädettävä hihna; Liukumaton; Kova päällinen; Täytettävä; Pehmeä päällinen; Muu
de: Surfbrett-Eigenschaften: Verstellbarer Riemen; Rutschfest; Hardtop; Aufblasbar; Softtop; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Vlastnosti surfovacej dosky: Nastaviteľný popruh; Protišmykový; Tvrdý povrch; Nafukovací; Mäkký povrch; Iné